test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjective-endings_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:
  
  # Standard Adjectives

  Standard adjectives ending in -a:  # making sure they can also take case endings as if they were just a noun
    # No case ending
    vanya+A: vanya
    vanya+A+Nsing: vanye
    # Singular
    vanya+A+Sing+Nom: vanya
    vanya+A+Sing+Acc: vanya
    vanya+A+Sing+Gen: vanyo
    vanya+A+Sing+Ins: vanyanen
    vanya+A+Sing+All: vanyanna
    vanya+A+Sing+Dat: vanyan
    vanya+A+Sing+Loc: vanyasse
    vanya+A+Sing+Loc+Short: vanyas
    vanya+A+Sing+Abl: vanyallo
    vanya+A+Sing+Poss: vanya{w}a
    # Dual
    vanya+A+Dual+Nom: [vanyat, vanyu]
    vanya+A+Dual+Acc: [vanyat, vanyu]
    vanya+A+Dual+Gen: [vanyato, vanyuo]
    vanya+A+Dual+Ins: [vanyanten, vanyunen]
    vanya+A+Dual+All: [vanyanta, vanyunna]
    vanya+A+Dual+Gen: [vanyato, vanyuo]
    vanya+A+Dual+Loc: [vanyatse, vanyusse]
    vanya+A+Dual+Loc+Short: vanyus  # also vanyates ???
    vanya+A+Dual+Abl: [vanyalto, vanyullo]
    vanya+A+Dual+Poss: ['vanyat{w}a', 'vanyu{w}a']
    # Plural
    vanya+A+Plur+Nom: vanyar
    vanya+A+Plur+Acc: vanyar
    vanya+A+Plur+Gen: vanyaron
    vanya+A+Plur+Ins: vanyainen
    vanya+A+Plur+All: vanyannar
    vanya+A+Plur+Dat: vanyain
    vanya+A+Plur+Loc: vanyassen
    vanya+A+Plur+Loc+Short: vanyais
    vanya+A+Plur+Abl: vanyallon
    vanya+A+Plur+Poss: vanyai{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Nom: vanyali
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Acc: vanyali
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Gen: vanyalion
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Ins: vanyalínen
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+All: [vanyalinna, vanyalinnar]
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Dat: vanyalin
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Loc: [vanyalisse, vanyalissen]
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: vanyalis
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Abl: [vanyalillo, vanyalillon]
    vanya+A+Plur+Par+Poss: vanyalí{w}a
  
  Standard adjectives ending in -ea:
    laurëa+A: laurea
    laurëa+A+Nsing: laurie
    # a few sample case endings
    laurëa+A+Sing+Gen: laureo
    laurëa+A+Sing+Loc+Short: laureas
    laurëa+A+Dual+Ins: [laureanten, laureunen]
    laurëa+A+Plur+Acc: laurear
    laurëa+A+Plur+Dat: laureain
    laurëa+A+Plur+Par+Ins: laurealínen
  
  Standard adjectives ending in -e:
    morë+A: more
    morë+A+Nsing: mori
    # a few sample case endings
    morë+A+Sing+Acc: more
    morë+A+Sing+Abl: morello
    morë+A+Dual+All: [morenta, morunna]
    morë+A+Plur+Nom: mori
    morë+A+Plur+Dat: morín
    morë+A+Plur+Par+Gen: morelion
  
  Standard adjectives ending in a consonant:
    firin+A: firin
    firin+A+Nsing: firini
    # a few sample case endings
    firin+A+Sing+Gen: firino
    firin+A+Dual+Acc: [firint, firinu]
    firin+A+Dual+Abl: [firinelto, firinullo]
    firin+A+Plur+Ins: firininen
    firin+A+Plur+Par+Dat: [firinelin, firillin]
  
  # Weirdo adjectives
  
  Adjectives ending in -e that have an -i stem:
    carnë+A: carne
    carnë+A+Nsing: carni
    # a few sample case endings
    carnë+A+Sing+Nom: carne
    carnë+A+Sing+Loc: carnisse
    carnë+A+Dual+Ins: [carninten, carnunen]
    carnë+A+Plur+Ins: [carnínen, carninen]
    carnë+A+Plur+Loc: carnissen
    carnë+A+Plur+Par+Dat: carnilin
  
  # TODO: add more adjective tests
